Illinois, session 104th, HB2890.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 2.03 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/2.03)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42.03)7    Sec. 2.03. In addition to the notice required by Section 82.02, each body subject to this Act must, at the beginning of 9each calendar or fiscal year, prepare and make available a 10schedule of all its regular meetings for such calendar or 11fiscal year, listing the times and places of such meetings.12    If a change is made in regular meeting dates, at least 10 13days' notice of such change shall be given by posting 14publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area 15in which such body functions. However, in the case of bodies of 16local governmental units with a population of less than 500 in 17which no newspaper is published, such 10 days' notice may be 18given by posting a notice of such change in at least 3 19prominent places within the governmental unit. Notice of such 20change shall also be posted at the principal office of the 21public body or, if no such office exists, at the building in 22which the meeting is to be held. Notice of such change shall 23also be posted on the website of the public body and supplied   HB2890- 2 -LRB104 08870 BDA 18925 b1to those news media which have filed an annual request for 2notice as provided in paragraph (b) of Section 2.02.3(Source: Laws 1967, p. 1960.)